Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7385.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 73
AGREEMENT TO PHASE OUT CORPORATE INCENTIVES COMPACT ACT
44-73-1. Membership.
Any state of the United States and the District of Columbia may become a member of this
agreement/compact by enacting this agreement in substantially the following form.
44-73-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Facility" means, but is not limited to, a headquarters, warehouse, outlet, affiliate,
office, or production facility of a company.
(2) "Party state" means a state that has enacted a statute agreeing to this compact.
(3) "Political subdivision" means governmental branches, departments, agencies, counties,
municipalities, special districts, as well as other governmental entities and quasi-governmental
entities created by the authorization of law.
(4) "Subsidy" means an economic benefit, direct or indirect, granted by a state government
or any political subdivision including, but not limited to, direct grants, tax consideration, favorable
bonding status, special district status, or any other benefit that has the effect of reducing

governmental costs for a venture or class of ventures compared to others similarly situated, with
the primary purpose or substantial effect of encouraging or maintaining within a state's or political
subdivision's borders particular or specific classes of ventures in which private persons have a
substantial financial or ownership interest.
44-73-3. Anti-poaching prohibition.
When two (2) or more states have passed and signed the compact, the party state
governments, or any political subdivision, shall not give a subsidy to a private enterprise for the
purpose of selectively supporting a specific industry or company, or to entice a specific industry or
company to relocate an existing facility from one party state to another party state or open a new
facility.
44-73-4. Compact administrator and exchange of information.
(a) The governor of each party state or the governor's designee is the compact
administrator.
(b) The compact administrator of each party state shall maintain an accurate list of all party
states.
(c) The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish to the compact administrator
of each other party state any information or documents that are reasonably necessary to facilitate
the administration of this compact.
44-73-5. Enforcement.
The attorney general of each member party state shall enforce this compact. A taxpaying
resident of any member party state has standing in the courts of any member party state to require
the attorney general of that member party state to enforce this compact.
44-73-6. Construction and severability.
This compact shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes. If any phrase,
clause, sentence or provision of this compact, or the applicability of any phrase, clause, sentence
or provision of this compact to any government, agency, person or circumstance is declared in a
final judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the Constitution of the United
States or is otherwise held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability
of the remainder of this compact to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be
affected. If this compact is held to be contrary to the constitution of any member party state, the
compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member party states and in full
force and effect as to the affected member party state as to all severable matters.
LC004351 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004351
========
LC004351 - Page 3 of 4